Connecticut, session 2026, HB05269.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective from passage) (a) For the purposes of this section,
(1) "energy drink" means a soft drink that contains (A) not less than
eighty milligrams of caffeine per nine fluid ounces, and (B)
methylxanthines, B vitamins, one or more herbal ingredients or an
ingredient labeled "energy blend", and (2) "social media" has the same
meaning as provided in section 9-601 of the general statutes.
(b) There is established a working group to (1) study the (A) health
risks associated with energy drink consumption by children, and (B)
anticipated effects of a prohibition on the sale of energy drinks to
children on (i) the state-wide sale of energy drinks, and (ii) public health,
and (2) make recommendations for (A) a public awareness campaign
concerning such risks that shall include, but need not be limited to, a
video recording for publication or broadcast on television and social
sHB5269 / File No. 13 1

sHB5269 File No. 13
media, and (B) signage alerting consumers to such risks, to be posted at
the point of sale of energy drinks in retail establishments.
(c) The Commissioners of Public Health and Consumer Protection
shall jointly convene the working group, which shall include, but need
not be limited to, the chairpersons and ranking members of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to children and public
health, and the following additional members, who shall be selected
jointly by the commissioners: (1) An individual with expertise in
advertising and marketing, (2) the parent or guardian of a child who
experienced adverse health conditions or died due to the consumption
of energy drinks, (3) a pediatric cardiologist, (4) a representative of a
state-wide chapter of a national association of pediatricians, (5) a
representative of a state-wide governing body for interscholastic athletic
activities, (6) a representative of a children's hospital in the state, (7) a
representative of a state-wide association of food retailers, wholesalers,
distributors and service providers, (8) a representative of a
manufacturer of energy drinks, and (9) a licensed athletic trainer. The
Commissioners of Public Health and Consumer Protection, or the
commissioners' designees, shall serve as cochairpersons of the working
group. The administrative staff of the joint standing committee of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to children
shall serve as administrative staff of the working group.
(d) Not later than November 1, 2026, the cochairpersons of the
working group shall submit a report on the working group's findings
and recommendations to the joint standing committees of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to children, public
health and consumer protection in accordance with the provisions of
section 11-4a of the general statutes.
Sec. 2. (NEW) (Effective from passage) (a) For the purposes of this
section, (1) "energy drink" means a soft drink that contains (A) not less
than eighty milligrams of caffeine per nine fluid ounces, and (B)
methylxanthines, B vitamins, one or more herbal ingredients or an
ingredient labeled "energy blend", and (2) "social media" has the same
sHB5269 / File No. 13 2

sHB5269 File No. 13
meaning as provided in section 9-601 of the general statutes.
(b) Not later than December 1, 2026, the Department of Consumer
Protection shall develop signage alerting consumers to the health risks
associated with energy drink consumption by children and make a
printable copy of such signage available on the department's Internet
web site. Such signage shall incorporate the recommendations
submitted by the working group established pursuant to section 1 of this
act.
(c) On and after January 1, 2027, each individual, firm, fiduciary,
partnership, corporation, limited liability company, trust or association
engaged in the business of selling energy drinks to retail consumers in
the state shall post the signage developed pursuant to subsection (b) of
this section in a conspicuous place at the point of sale of such energy
drinks.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
Sec. 2 from passage New section
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Section 1(b)(2)(B), "signage to be posted at the point of sale of energy
drinks in retail establishments alerting consumers to such risks" was
changed to "signage alerting consumers to such risks, to be posted at the
point of sale of energy drinks in retail establishments" for clarity, and in
Subsec. (d), "study" was changed to "findings" for clarity.
KID Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sHB5269 / File No. 13 3

sHB5269 File No. 13
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill makes various changes regarding energy drinks and children
resulting in no fiscal impact to the state.
Section 1 creates a working group to study the risks associated with
energy drink consumption by children and the anticipated effects of a
prohibition on the sale of energy drinks to children resulting in no fiscal
impact because the working group has the expertise to meet the
requirements of the bill.
Section 2 requires the Department of Consumer Protection to
develop signage regarding the health risks of energy drink consumption
by children and requires any business that sells energy drinks to post
the signage resulting in no fiscal impact to the state.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
sHB5269 / File No. 13 4

sHB5269 File No. 13
OLR Bill Analysis
sHB 5269
AN ACT ESTABLISHING A WORKING GROUP TO STUDY ENERGY
DRINK CONSUMPTION BY CHILDREN AND REQUIRING CERTAIN
SIGNAGE AT THE POINT OF SALE OF SUCH DRINKS.